California, session 20252026, SB515.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53060.8 is added to the Government Code, to read:53060.8. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) The purpose of this section is to enhance the accuracy, comprehensiveness, and consistency of demographic data concerning employees who are descendants of persons enslaved and emancipated in the United States, also known as American Freedmen, enabling more effective policy planning and resource allocation at and between local and state levels.(2) This section emphasizes the importance of safeguarding individual privacy and ensuring the secure handling of collected data in accordance with relevant privacy laws and regulations.(b) On or after January 1, 2027, a city, including a charter city, county, or city and county, when collecting demographic data as to the ancestry or ethnic origin of persons hired for employment by a city, county, or city and county, shall include additional collection categories and tabulations for Black or African American groups as described in Section 8310.6.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that enhancing accuracy, comprehensiveness, and consistency of demographic data concerning employees who are descendants of persons enslaved and emancipated in the United States is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 53060.8 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.